Washington statutes.
RCW 11.60.040

Conveyance of real property—Effect.

In the case of real property, a conveyance executed under the provisions of this title shall so refer to the order authorizing the conveyance that the same may be readily found, but need not recite the record in the case generally, and the conveyance made in pursuance of such order shall pass to the grantee all the estate, right, title, and interest contracted to be conveyed by the deceased, as fully as if the contracting party himself or herself were still living and executed the conveyance in pursuance of such contract.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2052; 1965 c 145 s 11.60.040. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 191; RRS s 1561; prior: Code 1881 s 626; 1877 p 130 s 629; 1854 p 293 s 153.]